Maryland, session 2025, HB0728.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Finance and Procurement
7–331.
(a) In this section, “Fund” means the Opioid Restitution Fund.
(b) There is an Opioid Restitution Fund.
(c) The purpose of the Fund is to retain the amount of settlement revenues
deposited to the Fund in accordance with subsection (e)(1) of this section.
– 1 –

Ch. 700 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(d) (1) The Fund is a special, nonlapsing fund that is not subject to § 7–302 of
this subtitle.
(2) The State Treasurer shall hold the Fund separately, and the
Comptroller shall account for the Fund.
(e) The Fund consists of:
(1) all revenues received by the State from any source resulting, directly or
indirectly, from any judgment against, or settlement with, opioid manufacturers, opioid
research associations, or any other person in the opioid industry relating to any claims
made or prosecuted by the State to recover damages for violations of State law; and
(2) the interest earnings of the Fund.
(f) The Fund may be used only to provide funds for:
(1) programs, services, supports, and resources for evidence–based
substance use disorder prevention, treatment, recovery, or harm reduction that have the
purpose of:
(i) improving access to medications proven to prevent or reverse an
overdose, including by supporting the initiative to co–locate naloxone with automated
external defibrillators placed in public buildings under § 13–518 of the Education Article;
(ii) supporting peer support specialists and screening, brief
intervention, and referral to treatment services for hospitals, correctional facilities, and
other high–risk populations;
(iii) increasing access to medications that support recovery from
substance use disorders;
(iv) expanding the Heroin Coordinator Program, including for
administrative expenses;
(v) expanding access to crisis beds and residential treatment
services for adults and minors;
(vi) expanding and establishing safe stations, mobile crisis response
systems, and crisis stabilization centers;
(vii) supporting the behavioral health crisis hotline;
(viii) organizing primary and secondary school education campaigns
to prevent opioid use, including for administrative expenses;
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 700
(ix) enforcing the laws regarding opioid prescriptions and sales,
including for administrative expenses;
(x) research regarding and training for substance use treatment and
overdose prevention, including for administrative expenses; and
(xi) supporting and expanding other evidence–based interventions
for overdose prevention and substance use treatment;
(2) supporting community–based nonprofit recovery organizations that
provide nonclinical substance use recovery support services in the State;
(3) evidence–informed substance use disorder prevention, treatment
recovery, or harm reduction pilot programs or demonstration studies that are not
evidence–based if the Opioid Restitution Fund Advisory Council, established under §
7.5–902 of the Health – General Article:
(i) determines that emerging evidence supports the distribution of
money for the pilot program or that there is a reasonable basis for funding the
demonstration study with the expectation of creating an evidence–based program; and
(ii) approves the use of money for the pilot program or demonstration
study; [and]
(4) evaluations of the effectiveness and outcomes reporting for substance
use disorder abatement infrastructure, programs, services, supports, and resources for
which money from the Fund was used, including evaluations of the impact on access to
harm reduction services or treatment for substance use disorders and the reduction in
drug–related mortality; AND
(5) OPERATING EXPENSES AND PERSONNEL COSTS FOR
INVESTIGATIONS, ENFORCEMENT ACTIONS, AND OTHER ACTIVITIES CONDUCTED BY
THE OPIOIDS ENFORCEMENT UNIT WITHIN THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL THAT ARE RELATED TO THE RECOVERY OF FUNDS FROM
OPIOID–RELATED JUDGMENTS OR SETTLEMENTS.
(K) BEGINNING ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2025, AND EACH OCTOBER 1
THEREAFTER, THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL REPORT TO THE
GOVERNOR AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT
ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY ON THE STATUS OF ACTIVITY OF THE OPIOIDS
ENFORCEMENT UNIT, INCLUDING:
(1) THE NUMBER OF INVESTIGATIONS TAKING PLACE;
(2) THE NUMBER OF LAWSUITS FILED; AND
– 3 –

Ch. 700 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) THE DISPOSITION OF LAWSUITS FILED.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025. It shall remain effective for a period of 4 years and, at the end of June 30, 2029,
this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and
of no further force and effect.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 4 –